Montana, session 2025, HB724.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 13-1-107, MCA, is amended to read:
"13-1-107. Times for holding primary elections -- cost of municipal election. (1) On the first
Tuesday after the first Monday in June third Tuesday in May preceding a general election held in an even-
numbered year, a primary election must be held throughout the state.
(2) On the Tuesday following the second Monday in September preceding a general election held
in an odd-numbered year, a primary election, if required, must be held throughout the state.
(3) The cost of a municipal election must be paid by the municipality."

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Notification to tribal governments. The secretary of state shall send a
copy of [this act] to each federally recognized tribal government in Montana.
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 724